Arkansas, session 2025, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-35-101 is amended to read as follows:
4-35-101. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide a means by which a
nonprofit corporation qualified corporation involved in the sale,
transmission, and distribution of potable water to members of the general
public and commercial, industrial, and other users may form or convert its
entity status from that of a body corporate to that of a public body politic
and governmental entity, thereby allowing the entity the opportunity to
access the tax-exempt capital markets and assuring the State of Arkansas and
the customers of the entity of the lowest water rates possible.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-35-103(7), concerning the definition of
"qualified corporation" under the Water Authority Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(7)(A) "Qualified corporation" means any:
*ANS127*
02/19/2025 3:39:58 PM ANS127

HB1547
(i) nonprofit A nonprofit corporation originally
formed pursuant to under the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-
33-101 et seq., the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act, § 4-28-201 et seq.,
or a predecessor statute, which among other things provides, distributes,
transmits, treats, pumps, or stores raw or potable water to or for the
benefit of members of the general public and commercial, industrial, and
other users or which that proposes to accomplish, develop, or construct any
of the foregoing; or
(ii) Any other governmental entity, municipal
entity, municipal authority, governmental authority, improvement district, or
rural development authority which provides, distributes, transmits, treats,
pumps, or stores raw or potable water to or for the benefit of members of the
general public and commercial, industrial, and other users that proposes to
accomplish, develop, or construct any of the foregoing.
(B) A qualified "Qualified corporation" includes a
nonprofit corporation an entity described under subdivision (7)(A)(i) and
subdivision (7)(A)(ii) of this section that constructs, expands, operates, or
maintains a wastewater project or wastewater treatment plant;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-35-202(a), concerning the conversion to a
public water authority, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Whenever a qualified corporation desires to convert to and become
reconstituted as a water authority under and pursuant to this chapter, the
qualified corporation shall present to and file with the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission:
(1) A resolution adopted by the board of directors of the
qualified corporation and, if the qualified corporation has members, the
members of the qualified corporation, which evidences the desire of the
qualified corporation to convert to and become reconstituted as a water
authority and which shall additionally certify that the qualified
corporation:
(A) Was initially formed as a nonprofit qualified
corporation; and
(B) Does not have the ability to directly access the tax-
exempt capital markets other than through a conduit issuer; and
(C) Desires to realize interest rate savings as a result
02/19/2025 3:39:58 PM ANS127

HB1547
of its conversion to and reconstitution as a water authority pursuant to
under this chapter;
(2) Articles of conversion and reconstitution which that shall
be signed by a majority of the water authority's proposed initial board of
directors and which shall state and include the following information:
(A) The name of the water authority, which shall include
the words “public water authority”, it being understood that the water
authority may adopt a fictitious operational name upon written request to and
approval by the commission and the Secretary of State;
(B) The location of the water authority's principal
office;
(C) The number of directors of the water authority, which
number shall be at least five (5) and shall be subject to change as provided
in this chapter or in the water authority's bylaws;
(D) The names and addresses of the proposed initial board
of directors of the water authority;
(E) The name and address of the agent for service of
process of the water authority;
(F) The proposed geographic service area over which the
water authority will have jurisdiction; and
(G) Any other matters that the proposed initial board of
directors of the water authority may deem necessary and appropriate;
(3) A copy of the water authority's proposed bylaws along with
any other information which the proposed initial board of directors of the
water authority may deem necessary and appropriate;
(4) A statement and certification from the Secretary of State
that the proposed name of the water authority is not identical to that of any
other water authority in the state or so nearly similar as to lead to
confusion and uncertainty;
(5) The filing and review fee that the commission may designate
and determine from time to time; and
(6) Any other information and documents which the commission may
designate and require.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-35-203(b)(2), concerning the filing of
articles of constitution or articles of conversion and reconstitution with
02/19/2025 3:39:58 PM ANS127

HB1547
the Secretary of State, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Filing Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this
section, filing a copy of the articles of constitution or articles of
conversion and reconstitution, as accepted and approved by the commission,
with the Secretary of State shall serve to terminate and dissolve the
previous corporate existence of the qualified corporation, effective as of
the date of the issuance of the certificate of existence.
(B) A qualified corporation may file a copy of the
articles of constitution or articles of conversion and reconstitution with
the Secretary of State that expressly states that the qualified corporation
shall continue its corporate or governmental existence.

























02/19/2025 3:39:58 PM ANS127